Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1013.
do enact as follows:AB1013,11Section 1. 440.03 (9) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,3,32440.03 (9) (bm) The department may do any of the following with respect to 3fees for massage therapy or bodywork therapy establishment licenses:AB1013,3,541. Establish reduced fees in the case of establishments under common 5ownership.AB1013,3,862. Establish reduced fees or waive fees for sole practitioner establishment 7licenses under s. 460.055 (1) (a) 2. a. or mobile massage therapy or bodywork 8therapy licenses under s. 460.055 (1) (a) 2. b. owned by sole practitioners.AB1013,29Section 2. 440.03 (13) (b) 38g. of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,3,1110440.03 (13) (b) 38g. Massage therapy or bodywork therapy establishment 11responsible manager or owner.AB1013,312Section 3. 440.03 (13) (c) 1. n. of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,3,1513440.03 (13) (c) 1. n. A responsible manager, as defined in s. 460.01 (5m), for or 14owner, as defined in s. 460.01 (5), of a massage therapy or bodywork therapy 15establishment.AB1013,416Section 4. 440.03 (13) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1013,4,51440.03 (13) (c) 2. The department of justice may submit the fingerprint cards, 2and the department of justice shall submit the fingerprint cards of all applicants 3identified in subd. 1. c. to L. n., to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose 4of verifying the identity of the persons fingerprinted and obtaining records of their 5criminal arrests and convictions.AB1013,56Section 5. 440.08 (2) (a) 46s. of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,4,87440.08 (2) (a) 46s. Massage therapy or bodywork therapy establishment: 8March 1 of each odd-numbered year.AB1013,69Section 6. 440.094 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 10Wisconsin Act 17, is amended to read:AB1013,4,1711440.094 (2) (a) (intro.) Notwithstanding ss. 441.06 (4), 441.09 (3) (b), 446.02 12(1), 447.03 (1) and (2), 448.03 (1) (a), (b), and (c) and (1m), 448.51 (1), 448.61, 448.76, 13448.961 (1) and (2), 449.02 (1), 450.03 (1), 451.04 (1), 455.02 (1m), 457.04 (4), (5), (6), 14and (7), 459.02 (1), 459.24 (1), and 460.02 (1m), a health care provider may provide 15services within the scope of the credential that the health care provider holds and 16the department shall grant the health care provider a temporary credential to 17practice under this section if all of the following apply:AB1013,718Section 7. 440.15 of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 76, is 19amended to read:AB1013,5,320440.15 No fingerprinting. Except as provided under ss. 440.03 (13) (c), 21441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 225. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9887 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.9889 23(3) (a) 9., 450.071 (3) (c) 9., 450.075 (3) (c) 9., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 243. and (5) (b) 2. a., and 459.70 (3) (b) 1., 460.055 (1) (a) 4., the department or a 1credentialing board may not require that an applicant for a credential or a 2credential holder be fingerprinted or submit fingerprints in connection with the 3department’s or the credentialing board’s credentialing.AB1013,84Section 8. 460.01 (2e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,5,75460.01 (2e) “Licensed massage therapist or bodywork therapist” means an 6individual licensed under this chapter as a massage therapist or bodywork 7therapist.AB1013,98Section 9. 460.01 (4g) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,5,129460.01 (4g) (a) “Massage therapy or bodywork therapy establishment” means 10a place of business held out to the public where massage therapy or bodywork 11therapy is regularly practiced or proposed to be regularly practiced, as further 12established by the board under s. 460.04 (2) (k), and includes all of the following:AB1013,5,1313(a) A mobile massage therapy or bodywork therapy service.AB1013,5,1414(b) A massage therapy or bodywork therapy school described in s. 460.095.AB1013,1015Section 10. 460.01 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,5,1916460.01 (4m) “Mobile massage therapy or bodywork therapy service” means a 17service whereby one or more licensed massage therapists or bodywork therapists 18work out of a vehicle or other mobile unit or travel to events using their own mobile 19structure or facility to provide massage therapy or bodywork therapy.AB1013,1120Section 11. 460.01 (4r) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,6,221460.01 (4r) “Out-call massage service” means a service whereby a licensed 22massage therapist or bodywork therapist travels only to clients' homes, offices, or 23other locations to provide massage therapy or bodywork therapy in those locations. 1“Out-call massage service” does not include a service that satisfies the definition of 2mobile massage therapy or bodywork therapy service.AB1013,123Section 12. 460.01 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,6,54460.01 (5) “Owner” has the meaning given by the affiliated credentialing 5board by rule under s. 460.04 (2) (i).AB1013,136Section 13. 460.01 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,6,97460.01 (5m) “Responsible manager” means an individual designated as the 8responsible manager for a massage therapy or bodywork therapy establishment 9under s. 460.135 (1).AB1013,1410Section 14. 460.01 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,6,1211460.01 (8) “Sexually oriented business” has the meaning given by the 12affiliated credentialing board by rule under s. 460.04 (2) (d).AB1013,1513Section 15. 460.01 (9) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,6,2014460.01 (9) “Sole practitioner” means a massage therapy or bodywork therapy 15business whereby the owner is an individual who is a licensed massage therapist or 16bodywork therapist who owns 100 percent of the business and practices 17independently for compensation at or for that business and is the only person who 18provides massage therapy or bodywork therapy for compensation at or for that 19business and has no other employees, independent contractors, or rent-space 20massage therapists or bodywork therapists.AB1013,1621Section 16. 460.02 of the statutes is renumbered 460.02 (1m) and amended 22to read:AB1013,7,923460.02 (1m) Massage therapist or bodywork therapist licenses. Except 24as provided in s. 460.03 (1m), no person may provide massage therapy or bodywork 1therapy, designate himself or herself as a massage therapist or bodywork therapist 2or masseur or masseuse, or use or assume the title “massage therapist and 3bodywork therapist” or “massage therapist” or “bodywork therapist” or “masseur” or 4“masseuse” or any title that includes “massage therapist,” “bodywork therapist,” or 5“bodyworker,” or append to the person’s name the letters “M.T.,” “R.M.T.,” “L.M.T.,” 6“C.M.T.,” “B.T.,” “B.W.,” “L.B.W.,” “R.B.W.,” or “C.B.W.,” or use any other title or 7designation that represents or may tend to represent that he or she is a licensed 8under this chapter massage therapist or bodywork therapist, unless the person is 9licensed as a massage therapist or bodywork therapist under this chapter.AB1013,1710Section 17. 460.02 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1013,7,1611460.02 (2m) Establishment licenses. (a) Except as provided in s. 460.03 12(2m), no person may provide massage therapy or bodywork therapy in a massage 13therapy or bodywork therapy establishment unless the establishment is licensed 14under s. 460.055. For purposes of this paragraph, each distinct massage therapy or 15bodywork therapy establishment, as further established by the board under s. 16460.04 (2) (k), shall require a separate license, regardless of ownership.AB1013,7,2017(b) Except as provided in s. 460.03 (1m) and (2m), no person may provide 18massage therapy or bodywork therapy outside a licensed massage therapy or 19bodywork therapy establishment unless the massage therapy or bodywork therapy 20is provided for an out-call massage service.AB1013,1821Section 18. 460.03 of the statutes is renumbered 460.03 (1m), and 460.03 22(1m) (intro.), (b) and (bm) 1. (intro.) and 3., as renumbered, are amended to read:AB1013,8,223460.03 (1m) Exemptions; massage therapist or bodywork therapist 1licenses. (intro.) A massage therapy or bodywork therapy license under this 2chapter is not required for any of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1013 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1013 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1013 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1013 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1013: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting